src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-hoppi_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - hõʹppi e-stem pöllö: # Noun - full paradigm
     hõʹppi+N+Sg+Nom: hõʹppi
     hõʹppi+N+Sg+Gen: hõʹppi
     hõʹppi+N+Sg+Acc: hõʹppi
     hõʹppi+N+Sg+Ill: [hõʹppja, hõʹppǥa]
     hõʹppi+N+Sg+Loc: hõʹppjest
     hõʹppi+N+Sg+Com: hõʹppjin
     hõʹppi+N+Ess: hõʹppjen
     hõʹppi+N+Par: hõʹppjed
     hõʹppi+N+Sg+Abe: [hõʹppitaa, hõʹppitää]
     hõʹppi+N+Pl+Nom: hõʹppi
     hõʹppi+N+Pl+Gen: hõʹppji
     hõʹppi+N+Pl+Acc: hõʹppjid
     hõʹppi+N+Pl+Ill: hõʹppjid
     hõʹppi+N+Pl+Loc: hõʹppjin
     hõʹppi+N+Pl+Com: hõʹppjivuiʹm
     hõʹppi+N+Pl+Abe: [hõʹppjitaa, hõʹppjitää]
